Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.030

Application of chapter—Plan 3 elements.

(1) This chapter applies only to members of plan 3 retirement systems created under chapters 41.32, 41.35, and 41.40 RCW.

(2) Plan 3 consists of two separate elements:

(a) A defined benefit portion covered under:

(i) Sections 101 through 117, chapter 239, Laws of 1995; or

(ii) Sections 1 through 25 and 201 through 213, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or

(iii) Sections 101 through 316, chapter 247, Laws of 2000; and

(b) A defined contribution portion covered under this chapter. Unless specified otherwise, all references to "plan 3" in this chapter refer to the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

[ 2000 c 247 s 402; 1998 c 341 s 302; 1995 c 239 s 203.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.